District of Columbia statutes.
38-502

Certification of immunization required.

No student shall be admitted by a school unless the school has certification of immunization for that student, or unless the student is exempted pursuant to § 38-506.

History

Sept. 28, 1979, D.C. Law 3-20, § 3, 26 DCR 380

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-502.
1973 Ed., § 31-2202.